Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1031.01
Appropriations Committee; duties.

The Appropriations Committee of the Legislature shall annually include the amount necessary to fund the state aid that will be certified to school districts on or before June 15, 2023, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter for each ensuing school fiscal year in its recommendations to the Legislature to carry out the requirements of the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.

Laws 1997, LB 710, § 17;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 54;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 34;

Laws 1999, LB 149, § 15;

Laws 2002, LB 898, § 14;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 51;

Referendum 2006, No. 422;

Laws 2007, LB21, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 48;

Laws 2009, LB61, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB545, § 22;

Laws 2009, LB548, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB711, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 24;

Laws 2011, LB18, § 13;

Laws 2012, LB633, § 5;

Laws 2013, LB408, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB838, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB119, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB430, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB880, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB583, § 9.